Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-399
Streets; grade; petition; contents; requirements.

All petitions authorized by sections 14-384 to 14-3,127 for changing the grade of streets or grading streets shall contain provisions waiving damages on account of such grading, and such petitions as well as protests authorized shall be signed and executed and filed in the manner required for petitions for street improvements.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 16, p. 201;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 105.